Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-227
County fair board; rules and regulations; fair management; duties.

The county fair board may adopt from time to time, and when adopted shall publish, such bylaws, rules and regulations as it may deem necessary, and shall publish a premium list, and shall do all things necessary and proper for the successful management of the fair.

Laws 1917, c. 168, § 8, p. 379;

C.S.1922, § 64;

C.S.1929, § 2-217;

R.S.1943, § 2-227.